hr-HR: Vrsta jezgre špule: Veliki kalup; Srednja osovina; Uska špula / izrazito velika osovina; Standardna osovina; Ultra velika osovina; Ostalo
nl: Type spoelas: Grote kern; Middelgrote kern; Smalle spoel/supergrote kern; Standaardkern; Ultragrote kern; Overig
es: Tipo de árbol: Eje grande; Eje mediano; Bobina estrecha/eje súper grande; Eje estándar; Eje ultragrande; Otro
ru: Тип вала: С большой шпулей; Со средней шпулей; Узкая/сверхбольшая шпуля; Стандартная шпуля; Сверхбольшая шпуля; Другое
vi: Loại trục cuộn dây: Trục to (Large arbor); Trục trung bình (Mid arbor); Ống cước hẹp/trục cực to; Trục tiêu chuẩn; Trục siêu to; Khác
sv: Arbor-typ: Stor spolkärna; Mellanstor spolkärna; Smal spole/extra stor spolkärna; Standardspolkärna; Extremt stor spolkärna; Annan
de: Laubentyp: Großkern; Mittelkern; Schmale Spule/Super-Großkern; Standardkern; Ultra-Großkern; Sonstige
it: Tipo di albero: Bobina large arbor; Bobina mid arbor; Bobina stretta/super large arbor; Bobina standard; Bobina ultra large arbor; Altro
bg-BG: Тип шпула: Голяма шпула; Средна шпула; Тясна макара/супер голяма шпула; Стандартна шпула; Ултра голяма шпула; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de carreto: Eixo grande; Eixo médio; Bobina estreita/eixo supergrande; Eixo padrão; Eixo ultragrande; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta loka: Velika os; Srednja os; Ozka tuljava/zelo velika os; Standardna os; Ultra velika os; Drugo
el: Τύπος άξονα στήριξης: Μεγάλη μπομπίνα (arbor); Μεσαία μπομπίνα (arbor); Στενό καρούλι/πολύ μεγάλη μπομπίνα; Τυπική μπομπίνα (arbor); Εξαιρετικά μεγάλη μπομπίνα (arbor); Άλλο
nb: Arbortype: Storspole; Mellomstor spole; Smal spole / ekstra stor spole; Standard spole; Ultra stor spole; Annet
zh-TW: 軸心類型: 大線軸; 中線軸; 窄線軸/超大線軸; 標準線軸; 極大線軸; 其他
da: Buetype: Stor spolekerne; Mellem spolekerne; Smal spole/meget stor spolekerne; Standardspolekerne; Ekstra stor spolekerne; Andet
th: ประเภทแกนหมุน: แกนใหญ่; แกนกลาง; สปูลแคบ/แกนใหญ่พิเศษ; แกนมาตรฐาน; แกนใหญ่พิเศษมาก; อื่นๆ
ko: 아버 유형: 라지 아버; 미드 아버; 내로우 스풀/슈퍼 라지 아버; 표준 아버; 울트라 라지 아버; 기타
cs: Typ trnu: Velké jádro; Střední jádro; Úzká cívka / velmi velké jádro; Standardní jádro; Extra velké jádro; Jiné
zh-CN: 线轮类型: 大轴径; 中轴径; 窄线杯/超大轴径; 标准轴径; 极大轴径; 其他
hu: Befogó típusa: Large arbor (nagy magátmérő); Mid arbor (közepes magátmérő); Keskeny dob / szuper nagy magátmérő; Standard arbor (normál magátmérő); Ultra large arbor (extra nagy magátmérő); Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ vretena: Veľký priemer; Stredný priemer; Úzka cievka/super veľký priemer; Štandardný priemer; Ultra veľký priemer; Iný
ja: 樹木タイプ: ラージアーバー; ミッドアーバー; ナロースプール/スーパーラージアーバー; スタンダードアーバー; ウルトララージアーバー; その他
ro-RO: Tipul arborelui: Tambur mare; Tambur mediu; Tambur îngust/tambur foarte mare; Tambur standard; Tambur ultra mare; Altele
en: Arbor type: Large arbor; Mid arbor; Narrow spool/super large arbor; Standard arbor; Ultra large arbor; Other
tr: Mil tipi: Geniş makara göbeği; Orta makara göbeği; Dar bobin/süper geniş makara göbeği; Standart makara göbeği; Ultra geniş makara göbeği; Diğer
fi: Kelan akselityyppi: Laajakehäinen; Keskilaajakehäinen; Kapea puola / erittäin laajakehäinen; Vakiokehäinen; Ultralaajakehäinen; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de eixo da bobina: Carretel largo; Carretel médio; Carretel estreito/super largo; Carretel padrão; Carretel ultralargo; Outro
lt-LT: Grotelių tipas: Plati ašis; Vidutinė ašis; Siauras būgnelis / ypač plati ašis; Standartinė ašis; Itin plati ašis; Kita
pl: Typ szpuli: Duży trzpień (Large arbor); Średni trzpień (Mid arbor); Wąska szpula / Bardzo duży trzpień (Super large arbor); Standardowy trzpień; Ultraszeroki trzpień (Ultra large arbor); Inny
fr: Type d’arbor: Moyeu large; Moyeu moyen; Bobine étroite/super large arbor; Moyeu standard; Moyeu ultra large; Autre